Tables/Contraction/de-kurzschrift-1998.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2019 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://brltty.app/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# BRLTTY Contraction Table - German (contracted - 1998 standard)
# Created by Mario Lang <mlang@delysid.org>.

include de-vollschrift.ctb

class e e
class g g
class h h
class m m
class n n
class r r
class hilrs hilrs
class st st
class konsonant bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxyz

# Ausnahmen für Vokalgruppen aus de-vollschrift.ctb
before e always arteri 356-2345-12456-24
always barrier 12-356-1235-24-12456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always bankier 12-235-13-24-12456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
midendword iell 24-15-12345 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always indien 35-145-24-14 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always karrier 13-356-1235-24-12456
always medien 134-15-145-24-14 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always propriet 12345-1234-1235-24-15-2345 proprietär shouldn't use the ie-contraction
endword serie 234-12456-24-15
always spezies 234-1234-15-1356-24-123456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction

# Due to their low usage frequency in typical german text the letters
# c, q, x and y are reused for the en-, ll-, ex/mm/nis- and el-contractions.
# Therefore they need a proceding letsign to disambiguate them.
always c 6-14
always C 6-14
always q 6-12345
always Q 6-12345
always x 6-1346
always X 6-1346
always y 6-13456
always Y 6-13456

always europa 126-1235-135-1234-1
begword neuro 1345-126-1235-135
always olympia =

# Doppelvokale
always frisbee 124-1235-24-234-12-15-15
always kaffee 13-1-124-124-15-15
always coffee 6-14-135-124-124-15-15
always toffee 2345-135-124-124-15-15
always dragee 145-1235-1-1245-15-15
always bungee 12-256-1245-15-15
always dorothee 145-26-135-2345-125-15-15
always cheese 1456-15-15-234-15
always pappmaschee 1234-1-1234-1234-134-1-156-15-15
always klischee 13-123-24-156-15-15
always yankee 6-13456-235-13-15-15

always gelee 1245-13456-15-15
prfword geleerte 12346-123-15-15-1235-236
always geleert 12346-123-15-15-1235-2345

always soufflee =
always defilee 145-15-124-24-123-15-15
always klee 13-123-15-15
always renommee 1235-14-135-1346-15-15
always armee 356-134-15-15
always resümee 1235-123456-1256-134-15-15
always schnee 156-1345-15-15
always trainee 2345-1235-1-24-1345-15-15
always pralinee 1234-1235-1-123-35-15-15
always portmonee 1234-26-2345-134-135-1345-15-15
always kanapee 13-235-1-1234-15-15
always portepee 1234-26-236-1234-15-15
always separee 234-15-1234-356-15-15
always referee 1235-15-124-12456-15-15
always schikoree 156-24-13-26-15-15
always spree 234-1234-1235-15-15
always karree 13-356-1235-15-15
always porree 1234-26-1235-15-15
always püree 1234-1256-1235-15-15
always frikassee 124-1235-24-13-1-2346-15-15
always plissee 1234-123-24-2346-15-15
always varietee 1236-356-24-15-2345-15-15
always komitee 13-135-134-24-2345-15-15
always trustee 2345-1235-136-23456-15-15
always frottee 124-1235-135-2345-2345-15-15
always queen =
always halloween 125-1-12345-135-2456-15-15-1345

always hawaii 125-1-2456-1-24-24
always ascii 1-234-6-14-24-24

always boom 12-135-135-134
always voodoo 1236-135-135-145-135-135
always yahoo 6-13456-1-125-135-135
always waterloo 2456-1-2345-12456-123-135-135
always shampoo 234-125-1-134-1234-135-135
always tattoo 2345-1-2345-2345-135-135
always daewoo 145-1-15-2456-135-135
always zoo 1356-135-135

always erdbeer 12456-145-12-15-15-1235
always zwergerdbeer 1356-2456-12456-1245-12456-145-12-15-15-1235
always ägypten 345-1245-6-13456-1234-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always aegypten 345-1245-6-13456-1234-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction

# Lautgruppenkürzungen
midendword ach 56
begmidword al 25
begmidword : 6-25
begmidword an 235
begmidword ar 356
begmidword be 23
midendword beule 12-126-123-15
midendword beulen 12-126-123-14
before g always beu 12-126
always bell 23-12345 tabelle should use the ll-contraction
midendword ck 46
midword eh 2356
always kohle =
always kohlen 13-135-125-123-14
always kohleintopf 13-135-125-123-1246-2345-135-1234-124
always kohleintöpf 13-135-125-123-1246-2345-246-1234-124
before g always kohleinla 13-135-125-123-1246-123-1
before e always kohleul 13-135-125-123-126-123 ⠨⠅⠕⠓⠇⠣⠇⠉
always ein 1246
always einnen 15-35-1345-14 ⠨⠯⠓⠌⠎⠑⠔⠝⠉⠎⠩⠦ ⠨⠯⠓⠌⠎⠑⠔⠝⠉⠞⠷⠏⠻⠁⠞⠥⠗ ⠨⠧⠊⠵⠑⠔⠝⠉⠍⠔⠊⠾⠻
always lateinisch 123-1-2345-146-1345-24-156 shouldn't use the ein-contraction
always el 13456
begmidword elineal 15-123-35-15-25
endword elineal 15-123-35-15-1-123
always eleist 15-123-146-23456
always em 12356
always temperatur 2345-12356-1234-12456-1-2345-136-1235 prefer em-contraction over te-contraction
always emach 15-134-56
before e always emachs 12356-56-234 Systemachse
always en 14
always denunz 145-15-1345-256-1356 shouldn't use the en-contraction
always er 12456
always dereferenzier 145-15-1235-15-124-12456-14-1356-346-1235 shouldn't use the er-contraction
always deregulier 145-15-1235-15-1245-136-123-346-1235 shouldn't use the er-contraction
prfword gebäudes 12346-12-34-145-123456
before hilrs always gebäude 12346-12-34-145-15
before hilrs always gemeinde 12346-134-1246-145-15 gemeinderat shouldn't use the er-contraction
always es 123456
always ge 12346
prfword gehe 1245-2356-15
prfword gehen 1245-2356-14
prfword gehend 1245-2356-14-145
prfword gehende 1245-2356-14-145-15
prfword gehendem 1245-2356-14-145-12356
prfword gehenden 1245-2356-14-145-14
prfword gehender 1245-2356-14-145-12456
prfword gehendes 1245-2356-14-145-123456
before konsonant always geh 1245-2356
always umgehung 136-134-1245-2356-136 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
before konsonant always bel 12-13456 Übelkeit shouldn't use the be-contraction
word bel 12-13456
before konsonant always bem 12-12356
before konsonant always ben 12-14
before konsonant always ber 12-12456
before konsonant always gel 1245-13456 klingelton shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always ziegel 1356-346-1245-13456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
before konsonant always gen 1245-14
begword lungen 123-256-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
begword magen 134-1-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
before konsonant always ten 2345-14
always elefant 13456-15-124-235-2345
before konsonant always ter 2345-12456
always güter 1245-1256-2345-12456 should use the er-contraction
always güteregel 1245-1256-236-1235-15-1245-13456
always gütericht 1245-1256-236-2-3456
always schulter 156-136-123-2345-12456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always theater 2345-125-15-1-2345-12456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
midendword ich 3456
midendword ig 45
always in 35

midendword lich 456
always lichtbogen 123-3456-2345-12-135-1245-14 shouldn't use the lich-contraction
always lichtnahr 123-3456-2345-1345-1-125-1235 shouldn't use the lich-contraction
always lichtsch 123-3456-2345-156
always bodenlicht 12-135-145-14-123-3456-2345 shouldn't use the lich-contraction
begword see =
begword neusee 1345-126-234-15-15
before konsonant always seen 234-15-14
word seele 234-15-13456-15
sufword seelen 234-15-13456-14
always seelisch 234-15-13456-24-156
begword tee =
word teer 2345-15-12456
sufword teerartig 2345-15-12456-356-2345-45
before konsonant begword teer 2345-15-12456
word teere 2345-15-12456-15
word teeren 2345-15-12456-14
word teerend 2345-15-12456-14-145
word teerende 2345-15-12456-14-145-15
word teerendem 2345-15-12456-14-145-12356
word teerenden 2345-15-12456-14-145-14
word teerender 2345-15-12456-14-145-12456
word teerendes 2345-15-12456-14-145-123456
word teerung 2345-15-12456-136
word teerungen 2345-15-12456-136-14
sufword teenager 2345-15-14-1-1245-12456
sufword teenie 2345-15-14-346
always teelich 2345-15-15-456 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always teelöffel 2345-15-15-123-246-124-124-13456 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always teemaschin 2345-15-15-134-156 shouldn't use the em-contraction
always teesieb 2345-15-15-234-346-12 shouldn't use the es-contraction
midendword ll 12345
always holland 125-135-123-123-235-145 shouldn't use the ll-contraction
always holländer 125-135-123-123-345-1345-145-12456 shouldn't use the ll-contraction
always hollaender 125-135-123-123-345-1345-145-12456 shouldn't use the ll-contraction
midendword mm 1346
always wurm = wurmmittel shouldn't use the mm-contraction
begmidword or 26

always schaos 234-1456-1-135-234
after konsonant midword ss =
after konsonant midendword ssatz 234-234-1356
after konsonant midendword ssätz 234-5-234-1356
after konsonant midendword ssaetz 234-5-234-1356
after konsonant midword ssch 234-156
always sschicht 234-156-3456-2345
always sschlag 234-156-1245
always sschläg 234-5-156-1245
always sschlaeg 234-5-156-1245
always sschließ 234-156-2346
always sschmuck 234-156-134-136-46
always sschnur 234-156-1345-136-1235 shouldn't use the nur-contraction
always sschool 234-234-1456-135-135-123 foreign word, sch-contraction not allowed
always sschreib 234-156-12
always sschrieb 234-2-156
always sschrift 234-156-2345
always sschwierig 234-156-45
always sselbst 234-234-23456
always sselbständ 234-234-13456-12-5-23456 shouldn't use the selbst-contraction
always sselbstaend 234-234-13456-12-5-23456 shouldn't use the selbst-contraction
after konsonant always ssetz 234-2-15
after konsonant midendword ssesam 234-234-123456-1-134 shouldn't use the sam-contraction
always ssicher 234-234-3456-12456
after konsonant always ssitz 234-2-24
always ssolch 234-234-1456
after konsonant midendword ssoll 234-2-234
always ssondern 234-234-1345
always ssozial 234-234-123
always espiel 15-2-346
always sspiel 234-2-346
always esprach 15-234-1234
always ssprach 234-234-1234
always sspräch 234-5-234-1234
always sspraech 234-5-234-1234
always esprech 15-2-2346
always ssprech 234-2-2346
after konsonant midendword sst 234-23456
always sstaat 234-23456-2345
after konsonant midendword sstand 234-2-23456
after konsonant midendword sständ 234-5-23456
after konsonant midendword sstaend 234-5-23456
after konsonant midendword sstell 234-2-13456
always ssteiger 234-23456-146-1245-12456
before e always sstund 234-23456-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
midendword ss 2346

midendword te 236
sufword atem 1-2345-12356 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always un 256

midendword tei 2345-146

always all 1-12345
always ell 15-12345
always emm 15-1346
always esch 15-156
always ess 15-2346
always est 15-23456

endword tel 2345-13456
always scheitel 156-146-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
begword bettel 12-15-2345-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
endword teln 2345-13456-1345
endword tels 2345-13456-234
endword tem 2345-12356
endword tene 2345-14-15
always tten 2345-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always tter 2345-2345-12456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always daten 145-1-2345-14 
always karten 13-356-2345-14
midendword maten 134-1-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
endword tenem 2345-14-12356
endword tenen 2345-14-14
endword tener 2345-14-12456
endword benes 12-14-123456
endword tenes 2345-14-123456
endword tens 2345-14-234
endword ter 2345-12456
endword tere 2345-12456-15
endword terem 2345-12456-12356
endword teren 2345-12456-14
endword teres 2345-12456-123456
endword ters 2345-12456-234
always liter 123-24-2345-12456
endword tern 2345-12456-1345
endword tes 2345-123456
